California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(3) A health care facility that fails or refuses to comply with a court order, issued in the enforcement of a subpoena, mandating the release of patient records to the board, that is accompanied by a notice citing this section and describing the penalties for failure to comply with this section, shall pay to the board a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each day that the documents have not been produced, up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), after the date by which the court order requires the documents to be produced, unless it is determined that the order is unlawful or invalid. Any statute of limitations applicable to the filing of an accusation by the board against a licensee shall be tolled during the period the health care facility is out of compliance with the court order and during any related appeals, or until the court declines to issue an order mandating release of records to the board.

(4) Any health care facility that fails or refuses to comply with a court order, issued in the enforcement of a subpoena, mandating the release of records to the board is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine payable to the board not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). Any statute of limitations applicable to the filing of an accusation by the board against a licensee shall be tolled during the period the health care facility is out of compliance with the court order and during any related appeals.

(c) Multiple acts by a licensee in violation of subdivision (b) shall be punishable by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment. Multiple acts by a health care facility in violation of subdivision (b) shall be punishable by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars
 ($5,000) and shall be reported to the State Department of Public Health and shall be considered as grounds for disciplinary action with respect to licensure, including suspension or revocation of the license or certificate.

(d) A failure or refusal of a licensee to comply with a court order, issued in the enforcement of a subpoena, mandating the release of records to the board constitutes unprofessional conduct and is grounds for suspension or revocation of their license.

(e) Imposition of the civil penalties authorized by this section shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(f) For purposes of this section, “certified medical records” means a copy of the patient’s medical records authenticated by the
 licensee or health care facility, as appropriate, on a form prescribed by the board.

(g) For purposes of this section, a “health care facility” means a clinic or health facility licensed or exempt from licensure pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 14.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2225.7.

When requested by an authorized officer of the law or by an authorized representative of the board, the owner, corporate officer, or manager of an entity licensed by the Board of Pharmacy shall provide the board, or its authorized representative, with the requested records within three business days of the time the request was made. The entity may request in writing an extension of this timeframe for a period not to exceed 14 calendar days from the date the records were requested. A request for an extension of time is subject to the approval of the board. An extension shall be deemed approved if the board fails to deny the extension request within two business days of the time the extension request was made directly to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 15.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2226.

The Division of Medical Quality or the Senior Assistant Attorney General of the Health Quality Enforcement Section may inspect a licensed general or specialized hospital and require reports from them to determine if the hospital has adopted and is complying with the provisions of Sections 2282 and 2283. They may inspect medical staff and patient hospital medical records subject to the provisions of Section 2225. Notwithstanding Section 2224, the division’s authority under this section shall be delegated only to a licensed physician and surgeon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1597, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

2227.

(a) A licensee whose matter has been heard by an administrative law judge of the Medical Quality Hearing Panel as designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code, or whose default has been entered, and who is found guilty, or who has entered into a stipulation for disciplinary action with the board, may, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter:

(1) Have his or her license revoked upon order of the board.

(2) Have his or her right to practice suspended for a period not to exceed one year upon order of the board.

(3) Be placed on probation and be required to pay the costs of probation monitoring upon order of the board.

(4) Be publicly reprimanded by the board. The public reprimand may include a requirement that the licensee complete relevant educational courses approved by the board.

(5) Have any other action taken in relation to discipline as part of an order of probation, as the board or an administrative law judge may deem proper.

(b) Any matter heard pursuant to subdivision (a), except for warning letters, medical
 review or advisory conferences, professional competency examinations, continuing education activities, and cost reimbursement associated therewith that are agreed to with the board and successfully completed by the licensee, or other matters made confidential or privileged by existing law, is deemed public, and shall be made available to the public by the board pursuant to Section 803.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 505, Sec. 6.   (AB 1070)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2227.3.

(a) The board may delegate to its executive director the authority to issue an administrative confidential letter of advice to a licensee to resolve a complaint for an alleged minor violation of this chapter that is not related to patient care. The letter of advice may include an agreement by the licensee to complete one or more relevant educational courses approved by the board, or its designee, or take other remedial action to resolve the complaint.

(b) The complaint and confidential letter of advice shall be maintained for three years from the date the complaint was received, and if no further complaint against the licensee is received, the complaint and confidential letter of advice shall be purged.

(c) A licensee’s failure to take the remedial action within the timeframe agreed upon constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(d) The board shall adopt regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 17.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2227.5.

The board shall keep a copy of a complaint it receives concerning the unprofessional conduct of a licensee for seven years or until the statute of limitations for filing an accusation against a licensee has expired, whichever period is shorter, if the board finds after an investigation that there is insufficient evidence to proceed with disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 816, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2228.

The authority of the board or the California Board of Podiatric Medicine to discipline a licensee by placing him or her on probation includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) Requiring the licensee to obtain additional professional training and to pass an examination upon the completion of the training. The examination may be written or oral, or both, and may be a practical or clinical examination, or both, at the option of the board or the administrative law judge.

(b) Requiring the licensee to submit to a complete diagnostic examination by one or more physicians and surgeons appointed by the board. If an examination is ordered, the board shall receive and consider any other report of a complete diagnostic examination given by one or more physicians and surgeons of the licensee’s choice.

(c) Restricting or limiting the extent, scope, or type of practice of the licensee, including requiring notice to applicable patients that the licensee is unable to perform the indicated treatment, where appropriate.

(d) Providing the option of alternative community service in cases other than violations relating to quality of care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 678, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2228.1.

(a) On and after July 1, 2019, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), the board and the Podiatric Medical Board of California shall require a licensee to provide a separate disclosure that includes the licensee’s probation status, the length of the probation, the probation end date, all practice restrictions placed on the licensee by the board, the board’s telephone number, and an explanation of how the patient can find further information on the licensee’s probation on the licensee’s profile page on the board’s online license information internet website, to a patient or the patient’s guardian or health care surrogate before the patient’s first visit following the probationary order while the licensee is on probation pursuant to a probationary order made on and after July 1, 2019, in any of the following
 circumstances:

(1) A final adjudication by the board following an administrative hearing or admitted findings or prima facie showing in a stipulated settlement establishing any of the following:

(A) The commission of any act of sexual abuse, misconduct, or relations with a patient or client as defined in Section 726 or 729.

(B) Drug or alcohol abuse directly resulting in harm to patients or the extent that such use impairs the ability of the licensee to practice safely.

(C) Criminal conviction directly involving harm to patient health.

(D) Inappropriate prescribing resulting in harm to patients and a probationary period of five years or more.

(2) An accusation or statement of issues alleged that the licensee committed any of the acts described in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1), and a stipulated settlement based upon a nolo contendere or other similar compromise that does not include any prima facie showing or admission of guilt or fact but does include an express acknowledgment that the disclosure requirements of this section would serve to protect the public interest.

(b) A licensee required to provide a disclosure pursuant to subdivision (a) shall obtain from the patient, or the patient’s guardian or health care surrogate, a separate, signed copy of that disclosure.

(c) A licensee shall not be required to provide a disclosure pursuant to subdivision (a) if any of the following applies:

(1) The patient is unconscious or otherwise unable to comprehend the disclosure and sign the copy of the disclosure pursuant to subdivision (b) and a guardian or health care surrogate is unavailable to comprehend the disclosure and sign the copy.

(2) The visit occurs in an emergency room or an urgent care facility or the visit is unscheduled, including consultations in inpatient facilities.

(3) The licensee who will be treating the patient during the visit is not known to the patient until immediately prior to the start of the visit.

(4) The licensee does not have a direct treatment relationship with the patient.

(d) On and after July 1, 2019, the board shall provide the following information, with respect to licensees on probation and
 licensees practicing under probationary licenses, in plain view on the licensee’s profile page on the board’s online license information internet website.

(1) For probation imposed pursuant to a stipulated settlement, the causes alleged in the operative accusation along with a designation identifying those causes by which the licensee has expressly admitted guilt and a statement that acceptance of the settlement is not an admission of guilt.

(2) For probation imposed by an adjudicated decision of the board, the causes for probation stated in the final probationary order.

(3) For a licensee granted a probationary license, the causes by which the probationary license was imposed.

(4) The length of the probation and end date.

(5) All practice restrictions placed on the license by the board.

(e) Section 2314 shall not apply to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 18.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2228.5.

(a) A physician and surgeon shall not automatically deny treatment or medication to a qualified patient based solely on a positive drug screen for tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) or report of medical cannabis use without first completing a case-by-case evaluation of the patient that includes, but is not limited to, a determination that the qualified patient’s use of medical cannabis is medically significant to the treatment or medication.

(b) The use of medical cannabis that has been recommended by a licensed physician and surgeon shall not constitute the use of an illicit substance in the evaluation described in subdivision (a).

(c) No physician and surgeon shall be punished, or denied
 any right or privilege, for having administered treatment or medication to a qualified patient within the requirements of this section and consistent with the standard of care.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Medically significant” means that a physician and surgeon has made a clinical determination that may include, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(A) The treatment or medication is contraindicated or is likely, or expected, to cause an adverse reaction or physical or mental harm to the qualified patient if administered or used in conjunction with THC
 or medical cannabis, based on the known clinical characteristics of the patient and the known characteristics and history of the patient’s treatment or medication regimen.

(B) The treatment or medication is expected to be ineffective based on the known clinical characteristics of the qualified patient and the known characteristics and history of the patient’s treatment or medication regimen.

(C) The treatment or medication, when administered or used in conjunction with THC or medical cannabis, is not clinically appropriate for the qualified patient because the treatment or medication is expected to do any of the following, as determined by a physician and surgeon:

(i) Worsen a comorbid condition.

(ii) Decrease the capacity to maintain a reasonable
 functional ability in performing daily activities.

(iii) Pose a significant barrier to adherence to, or compliance with, the qualified patient’s drug regimen or plan of care.

(D) Any other clinically or medically relevant determination.

(2) “Qualified patient” has the same meaning as defined in Section 11362.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 232, Sec. 1.   (AB 1954)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2229.

(a) Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Division of Medical Quality, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, and administrative law judges of the Medical Quality Hearing Panel in exercising their disciplinary authority.

(b) In exercising his or her disciplinary authority an administrative law judge of the Medical Quality Hearing Panel, the division, or the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, shall, wherever possible, take action that is
 calculated to aid in the rehabilitation of the licensee, or where, due to a lack of continuing education or other reasons, restriction on scope of practice is indicated, to order restrictions as are indicated by the evidence.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the division, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, and the enforcement program shall seek out those licensees who have demonstrated deficiencies in competency and then take those actions as are indicated, with priority given to those measures, including further education, restrictions from practice, or other means, that will remove those deficiencies. Where rehabilitation and protection are inconsistent, protection shall be paramount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1267, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2230.

(a) All proceedings against a licensee for unprofessional conduct, or against an applicant for licensure for unprofessional conduct or cause, shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) except as provided in this chapter, and shall be prosecuted by the Senior Assistant Attorney General of the Health Quality Enforcement Section.

(b) For purposes of this
 article, “agency itself,” as used in the Administrative Procedure Act, means any panel appointed by the board pursuant to Section 2008. The decision or order of a panel imposing any disciplinary action pursuant to this chapter and the Administrative Procedure Act shall be final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 678, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2230.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), and (e), any accusation filed against a licensee pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code shall be filed within three years after the board, or a division thereof, discovers the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action, or within seven years after the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action occurs, whichever occurs first.

(b) An accusation filed against a licensee pursuant to
 Section 11503 of the Government Code alleging the procurement of a license by fraud or misrepresentation is not subject to the limitation provided for by subdivision (a).

(c) An accusation filed against a licensee pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code alleging unprofessional conduct based on incompetence, gross negligence, or repeated negligent acts of the licensee is not subject to the limitation provided for by subdivision (a) upon proof that the licensee intentionally concealed from discovery his or her incompetence, gross negligence, or repeated negligent acts.

(d) If an alleged act or omission involves a minor, the seven-year limitations period provided for by subdivision (a) and the 10-year limitations period provided for by subdivision (e) shall be tolled until the minor reaches the age of majority.

(e) An accusation filed against a licensee pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code alleging sexual misconduct shall be filed within three years after the board, or a division thereof, discovers the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action, or within 10 years after the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action occurs, whichever occurs first. This subdivision shall apply to a complaint alleging sexual misconduct received by the board on and after January 1, 2002.

(f) The limitations period provided by subdivision (a) shall be tolled during any period if material evidence necessary for prosecuting or determining whether a disciplinary action would be appropriate is unavailable to the board due to an ongoing criminal investigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 617, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2231.

An administrative law judge as designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code may utilize the procedures in Section 11515 of the Government Code concerning any matters which may be officially or judicially noticed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1597, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

2232.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the board shall automatically revoke a license under either of the following circumstances:

(A) The licensee, at any time after January 1, 1947, has been convicted in any court in or outside of this state of any offense that, if committed or attempted in this state, based on the elements of the convicted offense, would have been punishable as one or more of the offenses described in subdivision (c) of Section 290 of the Penal
 Code.

(B) The licensee, at any time after January 1, 1947, has been required to register as a sex offender pursuant to the provisions of Section 290 of the Penal Code, regardless of whether the related conviction has been appealed.

(2) The board shall notify the licensee of the license revocation and of their right to elect to have a hearing as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) Upon revocation of the physician’s and surgeon’s certificate, the holder of the certificate may request a hearing within 30 days of the revocation. The proceeding shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government
 Code).

(c) This section shall not apply to a person who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code solely because of a misdemeanor conviction under Section 314 of the Penal Code.

(d) A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction after a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section. The record of conviction shall be conclusive evidence of the fact that the conviction occurred.

(e) If the related conviction of the certificate holder is overturned on appeal, the revocation ordered pursuant to this section shall automatically cease. Nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit the board from pursuing disciplinary action based on any cause other than
 the overturned conviction.

(f) The other provisions of this article setting forth a procedure for the revocation of a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate shall not apply to proceedings conducted pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 453, Sec. 2.   (AB 1636)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2232.5.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 2236, the board or its designee shall automatically suspend a license following a conviction of a felony by a licensee, where the conviction involves a violation of one or more of the statutes identified in subdivision (b) whether in the course of the licensee’s practice as a physician and surgeon or otherwise.

(2) The suspension shall remain in effect until the time for appeal has elapsed if no appeal has been taken, or until judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or has otherwise become final, and until the further order of the board.

(3) The board or its designee may decline to impose or may set aside the
 suspension when it appears to be in the best interest of justice to do so, with due regard being given to maintaining the integrity of, and confidence in, the profession.

(b) (1) Sexual abuse, misconduct, or relations with a patient pursuant to Section 726 or sexual exploitation as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 729.

(2) Offenses described in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 290 of the Penal Code.

(3) Serious felonies as defined in Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code.

(4) Selling, transporting, furnishing, administering, giving, possessing with intent to sell, or offering to sell, furnish, administer, or give to any person, any fentanyl or fentanyl laced product without a lawful prescription.

(c) (1) Following the conviction of a felony as described in subdivision (b), the board or its designee shall automatically revoke a license at such time as the time for appeal has elapsed with no appeal having been taken, or the judgment of conviction having been affirmed on appeal, or the judgment of conviction having otherwise become final.

(2) If the related conviction of the licensee is overturned on appeal, no revocation order shall be issued as to that conviction, and any suspension order issued pursuant to the above shall be rescinded, unless any such order is based on a stipulated settlement. Nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit the board from pursuing disciplinary action based on any cause other than the overturned conviction, including, but not limited to, the underlying conduct alleged in the criminal case.

(d) (1) The licensee may request a hearing within 30 days of the automatic suspension order described in subdivision (a) and the automatic revocation order described in subdivision (c). The proceeding shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) except as provided in paragraph (2).

(2) The Legislature finds and declares that the conviction of any felony identified in subdivision (b) is substantially related to the practice of medicine. An administrative law judge shall not permit or give any weight to expert testimony regarding whether the conviction is substantially related to the practice of medicine. The only purpose of an administrative hearing shall be to determine whether the discipline imposed shall be a suspension, revocation,
 or other action under the circumstances of the case.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 16.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2233.

The board may, by stipulation or settlement with the affected physician and surgeon, issue a public letter of reprimand after it has conducted an investigation or inspection as provided in this article, rather than filing or prosecuting a formal accusation. The public letter of reprimand may, at the discretion of the board, include a requirement for specified training or education. The affected physician and surgeon shall indicate
 agreement or nonagreement in writing within 30 days of formal notification by the board of its intention to issue the letter. The board, at its option, may extend the response time. Use of a public reprimand shall be limited to minor violations and shall be issued under guidelines established by regulations of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 285, Sec. 3.   (AB 1886)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2234.

The board shall take action against any licensee who is charged with unprofessional conduct. In addition to other provisions of this article, unprofessional conduct includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate any provision of this chapter.

(b) Gross negligence.

(c) Repeated negligent acts. To be repeated, there must be two or more negligent acts or omissions. An initial negligent act or omission followed by a separate and distinct departure from the applicable standard of care shall constitute repeated negligent acts.

(1) An initial negligent diagnosis followed by an act or omission medically appropriate for that negligent diagnosis of the patient shall constitute a single negligent act.

(2) When the standard of care requires a change in the diagnosis, act, or omission that constitutes the negligent act described in paragraph (1), including, but not limited to, a reevaluation of the diagnosis or a change in treatment, and the licensee’s conduct departs from the applicable standard of care, each departure constitutes a separate and distinct breach of the standard of care.

(d) Incompetence.

(e) The commission of any act involving dishonesty or corruption that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a physician and surgeon.

(f) Any action or conduct that would have warranted the denial of a certificate.

(g) The failure by a certificate holder, in the absence of good cause, to attend and participate in an interview by the board no later than 30 calendar days after being notified by the board. This subdivision shall only apply to a certificate holder who is the subject of an investigation by the board.

(h) Any action of the licensee, or another person acting on behalf of the licensee, intended to cause their patient or their patient’s authorized representative to rescind consent to release the patient’s medical records to the board or the Department of Consumer Affairs, Health Quality Investigation Unit.

(i) Dissuading, intimidating, or tampering with a patient, witness, or any
 person in an attempt to prevent them from reporting or testifying about a licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 17.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2234.1.

(a) A physician and surgeon shall not be subject to discipline pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 2234 solely on the basis that the treatment or advice he or she rendered to a patient is alternative or complementary medicine, including the treatment of persistent Lyme Disease, if that treatment or advice meets all of the following requirements:

(1) It is provided after informed consent and a good-faith prior examination of the patient, and medical indication
 exists for the treatment or advice, or it is provided for health or well-being.

(2) It is provided after the physician and surgeon has given the patient information concerning conventional treatment and describing the education, experience, and credentials of the physician and surgeon related to the alternative or complementary medicine that he or she practices.

(3) In the case of alternative or complementary medicine, it does not cause a delay in, or discourage traditional diagnosis of, a condition of the patient.

(4) It does not cause death or serious bodily injury to the patient.

(b) For purposes of this section, “alternative or complementary medicine,” means those health care methods of diagnosis, treatment, or healing that are not generally used
 but that provide a reasonable potential for therapeutic gain in a patient’s medical condition that is not outweighed by the risk of the health care method.

(c) Since the National Institute of Medicine has reported that it can take up to 17 years for a new best practice to reach the average physician and surgeon, it is prudent to give attention to new developments not only in general medical care but in the actual treatment of specific diseases, particularly those that are not yet broadly recognized in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 28.5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2235.

Upon referral from the division, the Senior Assistant Attorney General of the Health Quality Enforcement Section shall initiate action against any licensee who obtains a certificate by fraud or misrepresentation, including a reciprocity certificate which is based upon a certificate or license obtained by fraud or mistake. The division shall take action against any licensee whose certificate was issued by mistake.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1597, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

2236.

(a) The conviction of any offense substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a physician and surgeon constitutes unprofessional conduct within the meaning of this chapter. The record of conviction shall be conclusive evidence only of the fact that the conviction occurred.

(b) The district attorney, city attorney, or other prosecuting agency shall notify the Division of Medical Quality of the pendency of an action against a licensee charging a felony or
 misdemeanor immediately upon obtaining information that the defendant is a licensee. The notice shall identify the licensee and describe the crimes charged and the facts alleged. The prosecuting agency shall also notify the clerk of the court in which the action is pending that the defendant is a licensee, and the clerk shall record prominently in the file that the defendant holds a license as a physician and surgeon.

(c) The clerk of the court in which a licensee is convicted of a crime shall, within 48 hours after the conviction, transmit a certified copy of the record of conviction to the board. The division may inquire into the circumstances surrounding the commission of a crime in order to fix the degree of discipline or to determine if the conviction is of an offense substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a physician and surgeon.

(d) A plea or
 verdict of guilty or a conviction after a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section and Section 2236.1. The record of conviction shall be conclusive evidence of the fact that the conviction occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1206, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2236.1.

(a) A physician and surgeon’s certificate shall be suspended automatically during any time that the holder of the certificate is incarcerated after conviction of a felony, regardless of whether the conviction has been appealed. The Division of Medical Quality shall, immediately upon receipt of the certified copy of the record of conviction, determine whether the certificate of the physician and surgeon has been automatically suspended by virtue of the physician and surgeon’s incarceration, and if so, the duration of that suspension. The division shall notify the physician and surgeon of the license suspension and of the right to elect to have the issue of penalty heard as provided in this section.

(b) Upon receipt of the
 certified copy of the record of conviction, if after a hearing it is determined therefrom that the felony of which the licensee was convicted was substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a physician and surgeon, the Division of Medical Quality shall suspend the license until the time for appeal has elapsed, if an appeal has not been taken, or until the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or has otherwise become final, and until further order of the division. The issue of substantial relationship shall be heard by an administrative law judge from the Medical Quality Hearing Panel sitting alone or with a panel of the division, in the discretion of the division.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a conviction of any crime referred to in Section 2237, or a conviction of Section 187, 261, 288, or former Section 262, of the Penal Code, shall be conclusively presumed to be substantially related to the
 qualifications, functions, or duties of a physician and surgeon and a hearing shall not be held on this issue. Upon its own motion or for good cause shown, the division may decline to impose or may set aside the suspension when it appears to be in the interest of justice to do so, with due regard to maintaining the integrity of and confidence in the medical profession.

(d) (1) Discipline may be ordered in accordance with Section 2227, or the Division of Licensing may order the denial of the license when the time for appeal has elapsed, the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw the plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, complaint, information, or
 indictment.

(2) The issue of penalty shall be heard by an administrative law judge from the Medical Quality Hearing Panel sitting alone or with a panel of the division, in the discretion of the division. The hearing shall not be had until the judgment of conviction has become final or, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code, an order granting probation has been made suspending the imposition of sentence; except that a licensee may, at the licensee’s option, elect to have the issue of penalty decided before those time periods have elapsed. Where the licensee so elects, the issue of penalty shall be heard in the manner described in this section at the hearing to determine whether the conviction was substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a physician and surgeon. If the conviction of a licensee who has made this election is overturned on appeal, any discipline ordered pursuant to this
 section shall automatically cease. This subdivision does not prohibit the division from pursuing disciplinary action based on any cause other than the overturned conviction.

(e) The record of the proceedings resulting in the conviction, including a transcript of the testimony therein, may be received in evidence.

(f) The other provisions of this article setting forth a procedure for the suspension or revocation of a physician and surgeon’s certificate shall not apply to proceedings conducted pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 1.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2236.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Article 9 (commencing with Section 700) of Chapter 1 of Division 2 or any other provision of law, a physician and surgeon’s certificate shall be automatically placed on inactive status during any period of time that the holder of the certificate is incarcerated after conviction of a misdemeanor.

(b) A physician and surgeon’s certificate placed on inactive status pursuant to
 subdivision (a) shall be returned by the board to its prior or appropriate status within five business days of receiving notice that the physician and surgeon is no longer incarcerated. The board shall adopt regulations that specify the type of notice required to be submitted to the board.

(c) The reason for the inactive status described in subdivision (a) shall be disclosed on the board’s Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 169, Sec. 1.   (AB 1267)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2237.

(a) The conviction of a charge of violating any federal statutes or regulations or any statute or regulation of this state, regulating dangerous drugs or controlled substances, constitutes unprofessional conduct. The record of the conviction is conclusive evidence of such unprofessional conduct. A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section.

(b) Discipline may be ordered in accordance with Section 2227 or the Division of Licensing may order the denial of the license when the
 time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing such person to withdraw his or her plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, complaint, information, or indictment.
